New York, session 2025-2026, S9483.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "New York financial data rights act". 3 § 2. The banking law is amended by adding a new article 14-C to read 4 as follows: 5 ARTICLE 14-C 6 CONSUMER AND SMALL BUSINESS FINANCIAL DATA RIGHTS 7 Section 800. Definitions. 8 801. Consumer and small business right to data portability. 9 802. Prohibition of fees for data access. 10 803. Authorized representative obligations. 11 804. Security standards. 12 805. Enforcement and penalties. 13 § 800. Definitions. As used in this article, the following terms shall 14 have the following meanings: 15 1."Authorized representative" means any person or entity, other than 16 the financial institution holding the data, that seeks to access covered 17 data with the consumer's or small business's consent pursuant to section 18 eight hundred three of this article. 19 2. "Consumer" means an individual who resides in the state of New 20 York. 21 3. "Financial institution" means: 22 (a) a banking organization as defined in subdivision eleven of section 23 two of this chapter; 24 (b) any out-of-state state bank as defined in subdivision two of 25 section two hundred twenty-two of this chapter that maintains a finan- 26 cial product or service for a resident in this state; 27 (c) any person or entity acting as a custodian for financial assets as 28 described in section 11-1.9 of the estates, powers and trusts law; and 29 (d) any other data provider regulated by the department that maintains 30 a financial product or service for a resident of this state. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15201-02-6 S. 9483 2 1 4."Covered data" means the following information relating to a consum- 2 er or small business in the control or possession of a financial insti- 3 tution: 4 (a) Transaction information, including amounts, dates, payment types, 5 pending or authorized status, and payee or merchant names, for at least 6 twenty-four months preceding the request; 7 (b) Account balance information; 8 (c) Information to initiate payment to or from a covered account, 9 including account numbers; 10 (d) Terms and conditions of the consumer or small business, financial 11 product or service, including interest rates, credit limits, overdraft 12 coverage, rewards, and fee schedules; 13 (e) Upcoming bill information, including amounts and due dates; and 14 (f) Account and identity verification information, including name, 15 address, and contact information. 16 5. "Exempt data" means information that a financial institution is not 17 required to make available, subject to the requirements in subdivision 18 two of section eight hundred one of this article, consisting of: 19 (a) Any confidential commercial information, including proprietary 20 algorithms used to derive credit or risk scores; 21 (b) Information collected solely for the purpose of preventing fraud 22 or money laundering; 23 (c) Information required to be kept confidential by any other 24 provision of law; and 25 (d) Any information the financial institution cannot retrieve in the 26 ordinary course of business. 27 § 801. Consumer and small business right to data portability. 1. Upon 28 the request of a consumer, small business, or their authorized represen- 29 tative, a financial institution shall make available all covered data 30 they have requested in a secure, electronic, and machine-readable format 31 by which the consumer, small business, or authorized representative can 32 retrieve, retain, and transfer such data for processing into a separate 33 information system. 34 2. Financial institutions shall maintain a developer interface, such 35 as a standardized application programming interface, to receive and 36 respond to requests for access to covered data as set forth in subdivi- 37 sion one of this section. 38 3.(a) A financial institution shall not engage in or be a party to any 39 unreasonable denial or impairment of access by a consumer, a small busi- 40 ness, or authorized representative, including without limitation any 41 denial or impairment related to risk or security standards. 42 (b) Unreasonable denial or impairment under paragraph (a) of this 43 subdivision includes conduct that: 44 (i) Is likely to evade or unreasonably delay compliance with, or 45 interfere with, prevent, or materially discourage access of covered data 46 by a consumer, a small business, or an authorized representative; 47 (ii) Degrades, impairs, or creates barriers that would restrict or 48 systematically impede access to covered data by a consumer, a small 49 business or authorized representative; or 50 (iii) Is applied to a consumer, a small business, or authorized repre- 51 sentative in a discriminatory manner. 52 (c) A financial institution is not engaged in or a party to an unrea- 53 sonable denial of access by an authorized representative by denying 54 access if the denial: 55 (i) Is necessary to ensure compliance with specific safety and sound- 56 ness obligations of the financial institution's prudential regulator, S. 9483 3 1 and is based on standardized safety and soundness criteria available to 2 authorized representatives upon request; or 3 (ii) To comply with applicable law. 4 (d) A financial institution shall bear the burden of demonstrating 5 that a denial of access under paragraph (c) of this subdivision is 6 reasonable based on a specific, known risk likely to cause substantial 7 injury to consumers or small businesses, and that such denial is applied 8 consistently to authorized representatives facing the same or materially 9 similar risk. 10 (e) A financial institution shall provide prompt notice of any denial 11 of access to a consumer, small business, or authorized representative. 12 § 802. Prohibition of fees for data access. No financial institution 13 shall directly or indirectly impose a fee, assessment, or any other 14 charge to a consumer, small business, or authorized representative in 15 connection with receiving requests for or making available covered data 16 as required by section eight hundred one of this article. This prohibi- 17 tion applies to the establishment, maintenance, and usage of the devel- 18 oper interface. 19 § 803. Authorized representative obligations. 1. An authorized repre- 20 sentative must obtain express, informed consent from a consumer or small 21 business in order to request access to covered data on the consumer's or 22 small business's behalf. 23 2. Authorized representatives shall provide a simple and transparent 24 mechanism for a consumer or small business to view and revoke any 25 authorizations for data sharing at any time. 26 3. An authorized representative must limit its collection, use, and 27 retention of covered data to what is reasonably necessary to provide the 28 consumer's or small business's requested product or service. 29 4. An authorized representative must apply to its systems for the 30 collection, use, and retention of covered data an information security 31 program that satisfies the applicable rules issued pursuant to section 32 five hundred one of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (15 U.S.C. 6801) or, if 33 the authorized representative is not subject to section five hundred one 34 of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, the third party shall apply to its 35 systems for the collection, use, and retention of covered data the 36 information security program required by the federal trade commission's 37 standards for safeguarding customer information, 16 CFR part 314. 38 § 804. Security standards. For the purpose of authenticating a consum- 39 er's or small business's request pursuant to subdivision one of section 40 eight hundred one of this article, financial institutions shall use, at 41 a minimum, the same processes and information that they rely upon to 42 authenticate a consumer or small business for their online banking 43 portals. 44 § 805. Enforcement and penalties. 1. The superintendent of financial 45 services shall have the power to enforce the provisions of this article. 46 2. Any financial institution found to be in violation of this article, 47 including the improper charging of fees or the restrictions set forth in 48 subdivision three of section eight hundred one of this article, shall be 49 subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars per 50 violation. 51 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 52 have become a law.